apertium-ltz.ltz.dix
<pardef n="D/uerf__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>uerf</l>      <r>uerf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierfer</l>    <r>uerf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="D/uerf__n_nt_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>uerf</l>      <r>uerf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierfer</l>    <r>uerf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Dil/l__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Dil/l__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Doudew/on__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>een</l>       <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Doudew/on__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>een</l>       <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Dr/ot__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éit</l>       <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Dr/ot__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éit</l>       <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Duddels/ak__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>ak</l>        <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äck</l>       <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Duddels/ak__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ak</l>        <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äck</l>       <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Déi/f__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>f</l>         <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>f</l>         <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>we</l>        <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Déi/f__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>f</l>         <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>f</l>         <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>we</l>        <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="n"/><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="E/e__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eër</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="E/e__n_nt_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eër</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Eckz/ant__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r>ant<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änn</l>       <r>ant<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Eckz/ant__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r>ant<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änn</l>       <r>ant<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Equip/e__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pe</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Equip/e__n_f_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pe</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="n"/><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="F/aass__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>aass</l>      <r>aass<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ässer</l>     <r>aass<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="F/aass__n_nt_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>aass</l>      <r>aass<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ässer</l>     <r>aass<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="F/ach__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>ach</l>       <r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ächer</l>     <r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="F/ach__n_nt_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ach</l>       <r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ächer</l>     <r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="F/ascht__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>ascht</l>     <r>ascht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äscht</l>     <r>ascht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="F/ascht__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ascht</l>     <r>ascht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äscht</l>     <r>ascht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="F/auscht__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>auscht</l>    <r>auscht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äischt</l>    <r>auscht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="F/auscht__n_f_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>auscht</l>    <r>auscht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äischt</l>    <r>auscht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="F/ouss__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>ouss</l>      <r>ouss<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éiss</l>      <r>ouss<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="F/ouss__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ouss</l>      <r>ouss<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éiss</l>      <r>ouss<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="F/uuss__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>uuss</l>      <r>uuss<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iiss</l>      <r>uuss<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="F/uuss__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>uuss</l>      <r>uuss<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iiss</l>      <r>uuss<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Famil/l__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lje</l>       <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="Dill">            <i>Dil</i><par n="Dil/l__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Dill">            <i>dil</i><par n="Dil/l__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Doudewon">        <i>Doudew</i><par n="Doudew/on__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Doudewon">        <i>doudew</i><par n="Doudew/on__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Drot">            <i>Dr</i><par n="Dr/ot__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Drot">            <i>dr</i><par n="Dr/ot__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Duddelsak">       <i>Duddels</i><par n="Duddels/ak__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Duddelsak">       <i>duddels</i><par n="Duddels/ak__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Duerf">           <i>D</i><par n="D/uerf__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Duerf">           <i>d</i><par n="D/uerf__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Déif">            <i>Déi</i><par n="Déi/f__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Déif">            <i>déi</i><par n="Déi/f__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Eckzant">         <i>Eckz</i><par n="Eckz/ant__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Eckzant">         <i>eckz</i><par n="Eckz/ant__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Ee">              <i>E</i><par n="E/e__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Ee">              <i>e</i><par n="E/e__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Equipe">          <i>Equip</i><par n="Equip/e__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Equipe">          <i>equip</i><par n="Equip/e__n_f_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Faass">           <i>F</i><par n="F/aass__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Faass">           <i>f</i><par n="F/aass__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Fach">            <i>F</i><par n="F/ach__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Fach">            <i>f</i><par n="F/ach__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Famill">          <i>Famil</i><par n="Famil/l__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Fascht">          <i>F</i><par n="F/ascht__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Fascht">          <i>f</i><par n="F/ascht__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Fauscht">         <i>F</i><par n="F/auscht__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Fauscht">         <i>f</i><par n="F/auscht__n_f_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Fouss">           <i>F</i><par n="F/ouss__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Fouss">           <i>f</i><par n="F/ouss__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Fuuss">           <i>F</i><par n="F/uuss__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Fuuss">           <i>f</i><par n="F/uuss__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Héngeree">        <i>Héngere</i><par n="E/e__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Héngeree">        <i>héngere</i><par n="E/e__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Jupe">            <i>Jup</i><par n="Equip/e__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Jupe">            <i>jup</i><par n="Equip/e__n_f_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Knapplach">       <i>Knappl</i><par n="F/ach__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Knapplach">       <i>knappl</i><par n="F/ach__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Lach">            <i>L</i><par n="F/ach__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Lach">            <i>l</i><par n="F/ach__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Nueslach">        <i>Nuesl</i><par n="F/ach__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Nueslach">        <i>nuesl</i><par n="F/ach__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Ouschteree">      <i>Ouschtere</i><par n="E/e__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Ouschteree">      <i>ouschtere</i><par n="E/e__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Pak">             <i>P</i><par n="Duddels/ak__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Pak">             <i>p</i><par n="Duddels/ak__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Rot">             <i>R</i><par n="Dr/ot__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Rot">             <i>r</i><par n="Dr/ot__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Schlëssellach">   <i>Schlëssell</i><par n="F/ach__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Schlëssellach">   <i>schlëssell</i><par n="F/ach__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Spigelee">        <i>Spigele</i><par n="E/e__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Spigelee">        <i>spigele</i><par n="E/e__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Stot">            <i>St</i><par n="Dr/ot__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Stot">            <i>st</i><par n="Dr/ot__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Stouss">          <i>St</i><par n="F/ouss__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Stouss">          <i>st</i><par n="F/ouss__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Won">             <i>W</i><par n="Doudew/on__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Won">             <i>w</i><par n="Doudew/on__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Zant">            <i>Z</i><par n="Eckz/ant__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Zant">            <i>z</i><par n="Eckz/ant__n_m_lower"/></e>
